Utah statutes.
63J-1-216.   Allotment of funds to higher education.

(1)  The state fiscal officer may permit advances to be made from allotments to state institutions of higher education in sufficient amounts to provide necessary working bank balances to facilitate an orderly management of institutional affairs.

(2)  State institutions of higher education shall make reports, as required by the state fiscal officer, for the expenditure of funds included in any advances.

